New York, session 2025-2026, A9093.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Short title. This act shall be known and may be cited as 2 the "brightness emission analysis for motorist safety (BEAMS) act". 3 § 2. Legislative intent. The legislature finds that contemporary auto- 4 motive light emitting diode (LED) headlights, while designed to improve 5 visibility and safety for individual motorists, may pose significant 6 hazards to oncoming drivers and the general traveling public due to 7 increased glare or brightness. Excessive headlight glare or brightness 8 has become a growing safety concern across the State and the nation. 9 While high-intensity LED lighting may reduce certain collision risks for 10 the motorist using such technology, the unintended consequences for 11 oncoming motorists, including impaired vision, temporary blindness, and 12 potential long-term eye health concerns must be examined. The legisla- 13 ture recognizes the importance of imploring the federal government to 14 act in conjunction with automotive manufacturers to address this issue. 15 However, New York state possesses the resources and expertise to conduct 16 an independent study to further understand the impacts of LED headlight 17 glare. The results of this study will inform state-level policies, 18 support advocacy for federal action, and improve roadway safety for all 19 motorists. Therefore, this act directs the department of transportation EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13667-01-5 A. 9093 2 1 and the governor's traffic safety committee, in consultation with 2 academic institutions and technical experts, to perform a comprehensive 3 analysis and produce a detailed report on this matter. The findings of 4 such study shall be transmitted to appropriate federal agencies and 5 authorities for their consideration. 6 § 3. (a) Definitions. For the purposes of this act, the following 7 terms shall have the following meanings: 8 (i) "Commissioner" shall mean the commissioner of the New York state 9 department of transportation. 10 (ii) "Committee" shall mean the governor's traffic safety committee. 11 (iii) "Department" shall mean the New York state department of trans- 12 portation. 13 (iv) "Participating institution" shall mean the state university of 14 New York and the city university of New York, as well as the state 15 university of New York College of Optometry and any automotive programs 16 within the state university of New York and the city university of New 17 York. 18 (b) Study and report. The department and committee shall, within one 19 year of the effective date of this section, in coordination and consul- 20 tation with participating institutions, conduct a comprehensive study on 21 the impacts of automotive headlight brightness and glare on motorist 22 safety. Such study shall include, but not be limited to: 23 (i) examining LED low beam headlight and headlamp alignment standards 24 and practices; 25 (ii) assessing glare intensity and its effect on oncoming motorists; 26 (iii) analyzing short-term and long-term health implications of LED 27 headlight brightness and glare; 28 (iv) evaluating the dangers, risks, and potential liability associated 29 with excessive brightness and glare; 30 (v) compiling relevant data, accident reports, or research findings 31 pertaining to headlight brightness and glare; and 32 (vi) developing report on the findings of the study including, but not 33 limited to, recommendations for mitigating LED headlight brightness and 34 glare, including potential regulatory or technological solutions, and 35 any additional information or data deemed appropriate by the department, 36 committee, or participating institutions. 37 (c) Report. The commissioner shall deliver such report to the gover- 38 nor, the temporary president of the senate, the speaker of the assembly, 39 the senate committees on health, insurance, and transportation, and the 40 assembly committees on health, insurance, and transportation no later 41 than one year after the effective date of this act. Such report shall be 42 publicly posted on the department and committee's websites. 43 § 4. This act shall take effect on the sixtieth day after it shall 44 have become a law and shall expire and be deemed repealed one year after 45 such effective date.